Nebraska, session 109, LB1023.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1023 LB1023
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 77-2704.67, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.67 Sales and use taxes shall not be imposed on the gross
receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of and the storage, use, or
other consumption in this state of any sale of a membership in or an
admission to or any purchase by a nationally accredited zoo or aquarium
operated by a public agency or nonprofit corporation primarily for
educational, scientific, or tourism purposes.
Sec. 2. This act becomes operative on October 1, 2026.
Sec. 3. Original section 77-2704.67, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-